Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 4 Distribution, Storage, and Sale of Gas

Cross references.

Blasting or excavating operations near underground gas pipes and other underground utility facilities, Ch. 9, T. 25.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Gas companies’ certificates and safe installation and operation of transmissions and distribution systems, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Public Service Commission, Chapters 515-7-1 and 515-9-1 through 515-9-3.